Nevada, session 83, SB192.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or freestanding birthing center shall:
(a) Notify each patient who is deaf or hard of hearing and is in
labor or intends to give birth at the hospital or freestanding
birthing center that a qualified sign language interpreter is
available while the patient is in the hospital or freestanding
birthing center; and
(b) Upon the request of such a patient or his or her
representative, provide the patient with a qualified sign language
interpreter until the patient is discharged from the hospital or
freestanding birthing center, unless providing an interpreter
would be impractical under the circumstances or delay necessary
care for the patient.
2. At the request of a patient who is giving birth, a hospital or
freestanding birthing center shall allow a family member of the
patient and a doula to be present in the room with the patient
during the birthing process so long as the family member and
doula comply with the policies of the hospital or freestanding
birthing center, as applicable.
3. As used in this section, “qualified sign language
interpreter” means an interpreter, as defined in NRS 656A.030,
who:
(a) Has demonstrated proficiency in the practice of sign
language interpreting, as defined in NRS 656A.060;
(b) Is able to interpret effectively, accurately and impartially,
both receptively and expressively, using any necessary specialized
vocabulary or terms without changes, omissions, or additions and
while preserving the tone, sentiment and emotional level of the
original statement; and
-
*SB192_R1*

– 5 –
(c) Adheres to generally accepted ethics principles in the field
of sign language interpreting, including, without limitation, client
confidentiality.
Sec. 2. NRS 449.029 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.029 As used in NRS 449.029 to 449.240, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, “medical
facility” has the meaning ascribed to it in NRS 449.0151 and
includes a program of hospice care described in NRS 449.196.
Sec. 3. NRS 449.0301 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.0301 The provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428,
inclusive, and section 1 of this act do not apply to:
1. Any facility conducted by and for the adherents of any
church or religious denomination for the purpose of providing
facilities for the care and treatment of the sick who depend solely
upon spiritual means through prayer for healing in the practice of
the religion of the church or denomination, except that such a
facility shall comply with all regulations relative to sanitation and
safety applicable to other facilities of a similar category.
2. Foster homes as defined in NRS 424.014.
3. Any medical facility, facility for the dependent or facility
which is otherwise required by the regulations adopted by the Board
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed that is operated and
maintained by the United States Government or an agency thereof.
Sec. 4. NRS 449.160 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.160 1. The Division may deny an application for a
license or may suspend or revoke any license issued under the
provisions of NRS 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of
this act upon any of the following grounds:
(a) Violation by the applicant or the licensee of any of the
provisions of NRS 439B.410, 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, or 449A.100 to 449A.124, inclusive, and
449A.270 to 449A.286, inclusive, or of any other law of this State
or of the standards, rules and regulations adopted thereunder.
(b) Aiding, abetting or permitting the commission of any illegal
act.
(c) Conduct inimical to the public health, morals, welfare and
safety of the people of the State of Nevada in the maintenance and
operation of the premises for which a license is issued.
(d) Conduct or practice detrimental to the health or safety of the
occupants or employees of the facility.
(e) Failure of the applicant to obtain written approval from the
Director of the Department of Health and Human Services as
required by NRS 439A.100 or 439A.102 or as provided in any
regulation adopted pursuant to NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive,
and section 1 of this act, and 449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and
-
*SB192_R1*

– 6 –
chapter 449A of NRS if such approval is required, including,
without limitation, the closure or conversion of any hospital in a
county whose population is 100,000 or more that is owned by the
licensee without approval pursuant to NRS 439A.102.
(f) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 441A.315 and
any regulations adopted pursuant thereto or NRS 449.2486.
(g) Violation of the provisions of NRS 458.112.
(h) Failure to comply with the provisions of NRS 449A.170 to
449A.192, inclusive, and any regulation adopted pursuant thereto.
(i) Violation of the provisions of NRS 629.260.
2. In addition to the provisions of subsection 1, the Division
may revoke a license to operate a facility for the dependent if, with
respect to that facility, the licensee that operates the facility, or an
agent or employee of the licensee:
(a) Is convicted of violating any of the provisions of
NRS 202.470;
(b) Is ordered to but fails to abate a nuisance pursuant to NRS
244.360, 244.3603 or 268.4124; or
(c) Is ordered by the appropriate governmental agency to correct
a violation of a building, safety or health code or regulation but fails
to correct the violation.
3. The Division shall maintain a log of any complaints that it
receives relating to activities for which the Division may revoke the
license to operate a facility for the dependent pursuant to subsection
2. The Division shall provide to a facility for the care of adults
during the day:
(a) A summary of a complaint against the facility if the
investigation of the complaint by the Division either substantiates
the complaint or is inconclusive;
(b) A report of any investigation conducted with respect to the
complaint; and
(c) A report of any disciplinary action taken against the facility.
 The facility shall make the information available to the public
pursuant to NRS 449.2486.
4. On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, the
Division shall submit to the Director of the Legislative Counsel
Bureau a written report setting forth, for the previous biennium:
(a) Any complaints included in the log maintained by the
Division pursuant to subsection 3; and
(b) Any disciplinary actions taken by the Division pursuant to
subsection 2.
Sec. 5. NRS 449.163 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.163 1. In addition to the payment of the amount required
by NRS 449.0308, if a medical facility, facility for the dependent or
facility which is required by the regulations adopted by the Board
-
*SB192_R1*

– 7 –
pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be licensed violates any provision
related to its licensure, including any provision of NRS 439B.410 or
449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and section 1 of this act, or any
condition, standard or regulation adopted by the Board, the
Division, in accordance with the regulations adopted pursuant to
NRS 449.165, may:
(a) Prohibit the facility from admitting any patient until it
determines that the facility has corrected the violation;
(b) Limit the occupancy of the facility to the number of beds
occupied when the violation occurred, until it determines that the
facility has corrected the violation;
(c) If the license of the facility limits the occupancy of the
facility and the facility has exceeded the approved occupancy,
require the facility, at its own expense, to move patients to another
facility that is licensed;
(d) Except where a greater penalty is authorized by subsection 2,
impose an administrative penalty of not more than $5,000 per day
for each violation, together with interest thereon at a rate not to
exceed 10 percent per annum; and
(e) Appoint temporary management to oversee the operation of
the facility and to ensure the health and safety of the patients of the
facility, until:
(1) It determines that the facility has corrected the violation
and has management which is capable of ensuring continued
compliance with the applicable statutes, conditions, standards and
regulations; or
(2) Improvements are made to correct the violation.
2. If an off-campus location of a hospital fails to obtain a
national provider identifier that is distinct from the national provider
identifier used by the main campus and any other off-campus
location of the hospital in violation of NRS 449.1818, the Division
may impose against the hospital an administrative penalty of not
more than $10,000 for each day of such failure, together with
interest thereon at a rate not to exceed 10 percent per annum, in
addition to any other action authorized by this chapter.
3. If the facility fails to pay any administrative penalty imposed
pursuant to paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2, the
Division may:
(a) Suspend the license of the facility until the administrative
penalty is paid; and
(b) Collect court costs, reasonable attorney’s fees and other
costs incurred to collect the administrative penalty.
4. The Division may require any facility that violates any
provision of NRS 439B.410 or 449.029 to 449.2428, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, or any condition, standard or regulation
-
*SB192_R1*

– 8 –
adopted by the Board to make any improvements necessary to
correct the violation.
5. Any money collected as administrative penalties pursuant to
paragraph (d) of subsection 1 or subsection 2 must be accounted for
separately and used to administer and carry out the provisions of
NRS 449.001 to 449.430, inclusive, and section 1 of this act,
449.435 to 449.531, inclusive, and chapter 449A of NRS to protect
the health, safety, well-being and property of the patients and
residents of facilities in accordance with applicable state and federal
standards or for any other purpose authorized by the Legislature.
Sec. 6. NRS 449.240 is hereby amended to read as follows:
449.240 The district attorney of the county in which the facility
is located shall, upon application by the Division, institute and
conduct the prosecution of any action for violation of any provisions
of NRS 449.029 to 449.245, inclusive [.] , and section 1 of this act.
Sec. 7. NRS 49.295 is hereby amended to read as follows:
49.295 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsections 2 and
3 and NRS 49.305:
(a) A married person cannot be examined as a witness for or
against his or her spouse without his or her consent.
(b) No spouse can be examined, during the marriage or
afterwards, without the consent of the other spouse, as to any
communication made by one to the other during marriage.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to a:
(a) Civil proceeding brought by or on behalf of one spouse
against the other spouse;
(b) Proceeding to commit or otherwise place a spouse, the
property of the spouse or both the spouse and the property of the
spouse under the control of another because of the alleged mental or
physical condition of the spouse;
(c) Proceeding brought by or on behalf of a spouse to establish
his or her competence;
(d) Proceeding in the juvenile court or family court pursuant to
title 5 of NRS or NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [;] , and
section 22 of this act; or
(e) Criminal proceeding in which one spouse is charged with:
(1) A crime against the person or the property of the other
spouse or of a child of either, or of a child in the custody or control
of either, whether the crime was committed before or during
marriage.
(2) Bigamy or incest.
(3) A crime related to abandonment of a child or nonsupport
of the other spouse or child.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 9 –
3. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply in any criminal
proceeding to events which took place before the spouses were
married.
Sec. 8. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. NRS 287.04335 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
287.04335 If the Board provides health insurance through a
plan of self-insurance, it shall comply with the provisions of NRS
439.581 to 439.597, inclusive, 686A.135, 687B.352, 687B.409,
687B.692, 687B.723, 687B.725, 687B.805, 689B.0353, 689B.255,
695C.1723, 695G.150, 695G.155, 695G.160, 695G.162,
695G.1635, 695G.164, 695G.1645, 695G.1665, 695G.167,
695G.1675, 695G.170 to 695G.1712, inclusive, 695G.1714 to
695G.174, inclusive, and section 61 of this act, 695G.176,
695G.177, 695G.200 to 695G.230, inclusive, 695G.241 to
695G.310, inclusive, 695G.405 and 695G.415, in the same manner
as an insurer that is licensed pursuant to title 57 of NRS is required
to comply with those provisions.
Sec. 19. Chapter 392 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The board of trustees of each large school district shall
adopt a policy concerning the prevention of sudden cardiac arrest
during the participation of pupils in competitive sports sponsored
by a school.
2. The policy adopted pursuant to subsection 1 must require
that, before participating in a competitive sport sponsored by a
public school in the school district, a pupil must, if practicable,
receive an electrocardiogram screening conducted by a physician,
physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse or a
nonprofit organization whose mission relates to the health of
children or adolescents.
3. As used in this section, “large school district” means any
school district in this State which has more than 100,000 pupils
enrolled in its public schools.
Sec. 20. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 21. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*SB192_R1*

– 10 –
Sec. 22. Chapter 432B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, if a child
who has been placed in the custody of an agency which provides
child welfare services pursuant to NRS 432B.550 has been
diagnosed with a mental or behavioral health condition before or
after the placement, the agency which provides child welfare
services shall provide for an assessment of the child that:
(a) Meets the requirements of subsection 2; and
(b) Takes place with sufficient time before the date on which
the child leaves the custody of the agency which provides child
welfare services to allow for planning to meet the mental health
needs of the child after that date.
2. An assessment conducted pursuant to subsection 1 must:
(a) Be conducted by a psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced
practice registered nurse who has the psychiatric training and
experience prescribed by the State Board of Nursing pursuant to
NRS 632.120, marriage and family therapist, clinical professional
counselor or clinical social worker who is not receiving
compensation from or is not otherwise affiliated with any person
or entity with which the child is currently placed;
(b) Be conducted in a culturally competent manner that
respects the race, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, age,
gender, physical or mental disability, sexual orientation and
gender identity or expression of the child;
(c) Determine whether the child still suffers from the mental or
behavioral health condition with which the child was previously
diagnosed by comparing the results of the assessment to the
assessment which resulted in the initial diagnosis and any other
prior assessment conducted after the assessment which resulted in
the initial diagnosis; and
(d) Evaluate the progress of any treatment provided to the
child for the mental or behavioral condition with which the child
was previously diagnosed.
3. If the psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice
registered nurse, marriage and family therapist, clinical
professional counselor or clinical social worker who conducts an
assessment of a child pursuant to this section determines that the
child still suffers from the mental or behavioral health condition
with which the child was previously diagnosed and the mental or
behavioral health condition has not improved since that diagnosis
was made, the psychiatrist, psychologist, advanced practice
registered nurse, marriage and family therapist, clinical
professional counselor or clinical social worker, as applicable,
shall record in the medical record of the child:
-
*SB192_R1*

– 11 –
(a) The fact that the diagnosis has not changed; and
(b) Any recommendations for additional treatment.
4. An agency which provides child welfare services is not
required to perform an assessment in accordance with subsection
1 for a child described in that subsection if an assessment of the
child conducted after the initial diagnosis has determined that the
child no longer has a mental or behavioral health condition.
Sec. 23. NRS 432B.250 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.250 Any person who is required to make a report
pursuant to NRS 432B.220 may not invoke any of the privileges set
forth in chapter 49 of NRS:
1. For failure to make a report pursuant to NRS 432B.220;
2. In cooperating with an agency which provides child welfare
services or a guardian ad litem for a child; or
3. In any proceeding held pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive [.] , and section 22 of this act.
Sec. 24. NRS 432B.420 is hereby amended to read as follows:
432B.420 1. A parent or other person responsible for the
welfare of a child who is alleged to have abused or neglected the
child may be represented by an attorney at all stages of any
proceedings under NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [.] , and
section 22 of this act. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3,
if the person is indigent, the court may appoint an attorney to
represent the person.
2. A child who is alleged to have been abused or neglected
shall be deemed to be a party to any proceedings under NRS
432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [.] , and section 22 of this act. The
court shall appoint an attorney to represent the child. The child must
be represented by an attorney at all stages of any proceedings held
pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive [.] , and section
22 of this act. The attorney representing the child has the same
authority and rights as an attorney representing any other party to
the proceedings.
3. If the court determines that the parent of an Indian child for
whom protective custody is sought is indigent, the court:
(a) Shall appoint an attorney to represent the parent; and
(b) May apply to the Secretary of the Interior for the payment of
the fees and expenses of such an attorney,
 as provided in the Indian Child Welfare Act.
4. Each attorney, other than an attorney compensated through a
program for legal aid described in NRS 19.031 and 247.305, if
appointed under the provisions of subsection 1 or 2, is entitled to the
same compensation and payment for expenses from the county as
provided in NRS 7.125 and 7.135 for an attorney appointed to
represent a person charged with a crime.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 12 –
Sec. 25. NRS 432B.4675 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
432B.4675 Upon the entry of a final order by the court
establishing a guardianship pursuant to NRS 432B.4665:
1. The custody of the child by the agency which has legal
custody of the child is terminated;
2. The proceedings concerning the child conducted pursuant to
NRS 432B.410 to 432B.590, inclusive, and section 22 of this act
terminate; and
3. Unless subsequently ordered by the court to assist the court,
the following agencies and persons are excused from any
responsibility to participate in the guardianship case:
(a) The agency which has legal custody of the child;
(b) Any counsel or guardian ad litem appointed by the court to
assist in the proceedings conducted pursuant to NRS 432B.410 to
432B.590, inclusive [;] , and section 22 of this act; and
(c) Any person nominated or appointed as the person who is
legally responsible for the psychiatric care of the child pursuant to
NRS 432B.4684 or 432B.4685, respectively.
Sec. 26. Chapter 598A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 26.1, 26.2 and 26.3 of this
act.
Sec. 26.1. “Health care facility” means:
1. A medical facility, as defined in NRS 449.0151;
2. A facility for the dependent, as defined in NRS 449.0045;
and
3. A facility which is required by the regulations adopted by
the State Board of Health pursuant to NRS 449.0303 to be
licensed.
Sec. 26.2. “Private provider of emergency medical services”
means a person or entity that:
1. Holds a permit to operate an ambulance or air ambulance
pursuant to chapter 450B of NRS; and
2. Is not owned or operated by a federal, state or local
governmental entity or a federally recognized Indian tribe.
Sec. 26.3. 1. Not later than 7 days after receiving
notification of a reportable health care or health carrier
transaction pursuant to NRS 598A.390 or 598A.400, the Attorney
General shall post on an Internet website maintained by the
Attorney General:
(a) A summary of the proposed transaction;
(b) Information of the potential impact of the transaction on
access to health care, including, without limitation, the availability
of particular services and the cost of health care;
-
*SB192_R1*

– 13 –
(c) The scheduled date of the hearings held pursuant to
subsection 2; and
(d) A description of other methods by which members of the
public may provide comments on the proposed transaction,
including, without limitation, the dates on which such methods
will be available.
2. Not later than 30 days after receiving notification of a
reportable health care or health carrier transaction pursuant to
NRS 598A.390 or 598A.400, the Attorney General shall hold at
least one public hearing to allow practitioners, other interested
persons and entities and the public to provide comment
concerning the transaction.
3. The Attorney General may require any entity involved in a
reportable health care or health carrier transaction to submit a
report concerning:
(a) The potential impact of the transaction on access to health
care, the cost of health care and competition between group
practices or health carriers, as applicable;
(b) Any changes to available services, the health care
workforce or the operations of health care facilities that are
expected to result from the transaction; and
(c) Any measures being taken to mitigate the negative
consequences of the transaction.
4. After reviewing a reportable health care or health carrier
transaction, the Attorney General shall:
(a) Approve the transaction, if the Attorney General concludes
that the transaction is not likely to significantly reduce
competition in a relevant field or reduce access to critical health
care services or health carrier services;
(b) Deny the transaction, if the Attorney General concludes
that the transaction is likely to significantly reduce competition in
a relevant field or reduce access to critical health care services or
health carrier services; or
(c) Impose conditions on the transaction as necessary to
ensure that the transaction does not significantly reduce
competition in a relevant field or reduce access to critical health
care services or health carrier services.
5. If a reportable health care or health carrier transaction is
being conducted for the purposes of preventing the closure of a
group practice, health care facility or private provider of
emergency medical services or maintaining access to health care
in a medically underserved area, the Attorney General may
expedite review of the transaction pursuant to this section.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 14 –
Sec. 26.35. NRS 598A.060 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.060 1. Every activity enumerated in this subsection
constitutes a contract, combination or conspiracy in restraint of
trade, and it is unlawful to conduct any part of any such activity in
this State:
(a) Price fixing, which consists of raising, depressing, fixing,
pegging or stabilizing the price of any commodity or service, and
which includes, but is not limited to:
(1) Agreements among competitors to depress prices at
which they will buy essential raw material for the end product.
(2) Agreements to establish prices for commodities or
services.
(3) Agreements to establish uniform discounts, or to
eliminate discounts.
(4) Agreements between manufacturers to price a premium
commodity a specified amount above inferior commodities.
(5) Agreements not to sell below cost.
(6) Agreements to establish uniform trade-in allowances.
(7) Establishment of uniform cost surveys.
(8) Establishment of minimum markup percentages.
(9) Establishment of single or multiple basing point systems
for determining the delivered price of commodities.
(10) Agreements not to advertise prices.
(11) Agreements among competitors to fix uniform list
prices as a place to start bargaining.
(12) Bid rigging, including the misuse of bid depositories,
foreclosures of competitive activity for a period of time, rotation of
jobs among competitors, submission of identical bids, and
submission of complementary bids not intended to secure
acceptance by the customer.
(13) Agreements to discontinue a product, or agreements
with anyone engaged in the manufacture of competitive lines to
limit size, styles or quantities of items comprising the lines.
(14) Agreements to restrict volume of production.
(b) Division of markets, consisting of agreements between
competitors to divide territories and to refrain from soliciting or
selling in certain areas.
(c) Allocation of customers, consisting of agreements not to sell
to specified customers of a competitor.
(d) Tying arrangements, consisting of contracts in which the
seller or lessor conditions the sale or lease of commodities or
services on the purchase or leasing of another commodity or service.
(e) Monopolization of trade or commerce in this State,
including, without limitation, attempting to monopolize or otherwise
-
*SB192_R1*

– 15 –
combining or conspiring to monopolize trade or commerce in this
State.
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2, consolidation,
conversion, merger, acquisition of shares of stock or other equity
interest, directly or indirectly, of another person engaged in
commerce in this State or the acquisition of any assets of another
person engaged in commerce in this State that may:
(1) Result in the monopolization of trade or commerce in this
State or would further any attempt to monopolize trade or commerce
in this State; or
(2) Substantially lessen competition or be in restraint of
trade.
(g) Consummating a reportable health care or health carrier
transaction, as defined in NRS 598A.370:
(1) If the Attorney General has not approved the
transaction pursuant to subsection 4 of section 26.3 of this act; or
(2) In violation of any conditions imposed by the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 4 of section 26.3 of this act.
2. The provisions of paragraph (f) of subsection 1 do not:
(a) Apply to a person who, solely for an investment purpose,
purchases stock or other equity interest or assets of another person if
the purchaser does not use his or her acquisition to bring about or
attempt to bring about the substantial lessening of competition in
this State.
(b) Prevent a person who is engaged in commerce in this State
from forming a subsidiary corporation or other business
organization and owning and holding all or part of the stock or
equity interest of that corporation or organization.
Sec. 26.4. NRS 598A.290 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.290 As used in NRS 598A.290 to 598A.430, inclusive,
and sections 26.1, 26.2 and 26.3 of this act, unless the context
otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in 598A.300 to
598A.380, inclusive, and sections 26.1 and 26.2 of this act have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 26.5. NRS 598A.300 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.300 “Affiliation” means an agreement, arrangement or
activity, the consummation of which results in:
1. A group practice , health care facility, private provider of
emergency medical services or health carrier having control of
another group practice , health care facility, private provider of
emergency medical services or health carrier; or
2. A group practice , health care facility, private provider of
emergency medical services or health carrier coming under
-
*SB192_R1*

– 16 –
common ownership with another group practice , health care
facility, private provider of emergency medical services or health
carrier.
Sec. 26.6. NRS 598A.360 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.360 “Practitioner” means a physician licensed pursuant
to chapter 630 or 633 of NRS, physician assistant, anesthesiologist
assistant, licensed nurse, dentist, chiropractic physician, podiatric
physician, dispensing optician, optometrist, audiologist, speech-
language pathologist, hearing aid specialist, practitioner of
respiratory care, registered physical therapist, occupational therapist,
licensed psychologist , marriage and family therapist, clinical
professional counselor, clinical social worker, behavior analyst or
perfusionist.
Sec. 26.7. NRS 598A.370 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.370 1. “Reportable health care or health carrier
transaction” means any transaction that [:
(a) Results] results in a material change to the business or
corporate structure of a group practice , health care facility, private
provider of emergency medical services or health carrier [; and:] if:
(a) The entities involved in the transaction have a combined
value of at least $10,000,000; or
(b) As a result of the transaction, [would cause] a group practice
, health care facility, private provider of emergency medical
services or health carrier [to] would provide within a geographic
market [50] 33 percent or more of any health care service, including,
without limitation, a health care service involving a specialty, or any
health carrier service.
2. [The term does not include a transaction involving business
entities which:
(a) Are under common ownership; or
(b) Have a contracting relationship that was established before
October 1, 2021.
3.] As used in this section, a “material change to the business
or corporate structure of a group practice or health carrier” includes,
without limitation:
(a) The merger, consolidation or affiliation of a group practice ,
health care facility, private provider of emergency medical services
or health carrier with another group practice , health care facility,
private provider of emergency medical services or health carrier;
(b) The acquisition of all or substantially all of:
(1) The properties and assets of a group practice [;] , health
care facility or private provider of emergency medical services; or
-
*SB192_R1*

– 17 –
(2) The capital stock, membership interests or other equity
interest of a group practice , health care facility, private provider of
emergency medical services or health carrier;
(c) The employment of all or substantially all of the practitioners
in a group practice; and
(d) The acquisition of one or more insolvent group practices [.] ,
health care facilities or private providers of emergency medical
services.
Sec. 26.8. NRS 598A.390 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.390 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
any person conducting business in this State who is a party to a
reportable health care or health carrier transaction shall, at least [30]
60 days before the consummation of the reportable health care or
health carrier transaction, submit to the Attorney General a
notification on a form prescribed by the Attorney General. The
notification must contain the following information, to the extent
such information is applicable:
(a) A brief description of the nature of the proposed relationship
among the parties to the proposed reportable health care or health
carrier transaction;
(b) The names and specialties of each practitioner working for
the group practice that is the subject of the reportable health care or
health carrier transaction and who is anticipated to work with the
resulting group practice following the effective date of the
transaction;
(c) The names of the business entities that are anticipated to
provide health care services or health carrier services following the
effective date of the reportable health care or health carrier
transaction;
(d) An identification of each anticipated location where health
care services or health carrier services are to be provided following
the effective date of the reportable health care or health carrier
transaction;
(e) A description of the services to be provided by practitioners
at each location identified pursuant to paragraph (d); and
(f) The primary service area to be served by each location
identified pursuant to paragraph (d).
2. If a person who is a party to a reportable health care or
health carrier transaction is required to:
(a) Submit a copy of a filing to the Attorney General pursuant to
NRS 598A.400 regarding the transaction, the copy of the filing
submitted pursuant to NRS 598A.400 satisfies the requirement for
notification pursuant to subsection 1.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 18 –
(b) Submit a notification to the Commissioner of Insurance
pursuant to NRS 692C.363 regarding the transaction, the person
may satisfy the requirement for notification pursuant to subsection 1
by simultaneously submitting to the Attorney General a copy of the
notification submitted to the Commissioner of Insurance.
Sec. 26.85. NRS 598A.400 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.400 1. Any person conducting business in this State
that files a notification with the Federal Trade Commission or the
United States Department of Justice pursuant to the Hart-Scott-
Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976, 15 U.S.C. § 18a
regarding a transaction that involves any assets of a group practice ,
health care facility, private provider of emergency medical services
or health carrier in this State shall [simultaneously] submit a copy of
the filing to the Attorney General [.] at least 60 days before the
consummation of the reportable health care or health carrier
transaction.
2. A person that submits a copy of a filing to the Attorney
General pursuant to subsection 1 satisfies the requirement for notice
set forth in NRS 598A.390.
Sec. 26.9. NRS 598A.420 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.420 [All] Except as otherwise provided in section 26.3
of this act, information received by the Attorney General pursuant
to NRS 598A.290 to 598A.430, inclusive, and sections 26.1, 26.2
and 26.3 of this act must be kept confidential in the same manner
and to the same extent as required in NRS 598A.110.
Sec. 26.95. NRS 598A.430 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
598A.430 1. A person who willfully violates any provision of
NRS 598A.290 to 598A.430, inclusive, and sections 26.1, 26.2 and
26.3 of this act is subject to a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000 for
each day of the violation.
2. The provisions of paragraph (g) of subsection 1 of NRS
598A.060 and NRS 598A.290 to 598A.430, inclusive, and sections
26.1, 26.2 and 26.3 of this act do not establish a private right of
action against any person.
Sec. 27. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 28. Chapter 630 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 29 and 30 of this act.
Sec. 29. 1. The Board, in consultation with the State Board
of Nursing and the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, shall:
(a) Adopt regulations concerning the use of race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards by physicians and
physician assistants. Those regulations must list specific
-
*SB192_R1*

– 19 –
race-based health formulas and race-based care standards that
physicians and physician assistants are authorized to use. That list
must not include a race-based health formula or a race-based care
standard if there is a race-neutral health formula or race-neutral
care standard, as applicable, that is scientifically validated as
being at least as effective for the same purpose.
(b) Monitor evolving scientific research and, not later than 1
year after a race-based health formula or race-based care
standard included on the list of authorized race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards adopted pursuant to
paragraph (a) ceases to meet the requirements of that paragraph,
propose regulations to remove the race-based health formula or
race-based care standard from that list.
2. A physician or physician assistant shall not use or
authorize the use of a race-based health formula or race-based
care standard that is not included on the list of authorized race-
based health formulas and race-based care standards adopted
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Race-based care standard” means a standard of care that
requires or authorizes a physician or physician assistant to take
the race of the patient into account when making determinations
regarding the care that will be provided to a patient.
(b) “Race-based health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
calculating health-related data that takes the race of the patient
into account.
(c) “Race-neutral care standard” means a standard of care
that does not require or authorize a physician or physician
assistant to take the race of the patient into account when making
determinations regarding the care that will be provided to a
patient.
(d) “Race-neutral health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
calculating health-related data that does not take the race of the
patient into account.
Sec. 30. 1. Upon diagnosing a patient with arthritis,
osteoarthritis or any other condition that is regularly treated using
stem cell therapy, a physician or physician assistant shall discuss
with the patient the potential use of stem cell therapy to treat the
condition.
2. During the first encounter with a new patient, a provider of
primary care shall inform the patient of options that may be
available to the patient for donating, banking or storing stem cells
for future use by the patient or a donee.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 20 –
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(b) “Provider of primary care” means a physician, physician
assistant or group of providers of health care that includes a
physician or physician assistant which:
(1) Provides initial and primary health care services to a
patient; and
(2) Maintains the continuity of care for the patient.
(c) “Stem cell therapy” means a therapy involving the use of
human cells, tissues or cellular or tissue-based products.
Sec. 31. Chapter 632 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 32 and 33 of this act.
Sec. 32. 1. The Board, in consultation with the Board of
Medical Examiners and the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine,
shall:
(a) Adopt regulations concerning the use of race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards by registered nurses and
licensed practical nurses. Those regulations must list specific
race-based health formulas and race-based care standards that
registered nurses and licensed practical nurses are authorized to
use. That list must not include a race-based health formula or a
race-based care standard if there is a race-neutral health formula
or race-neutral care standard, as applicable, that is scientifically
validated as being at least as effective for the same purpose.
(b) Monitor evolving scientific research and, not later than 1
year after a race-based health formula or race-based care
standard included on the list of authorized race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards adopted pursuant to
paragraph (a) ceases to meet the requirements of that paragraph,
propose regulations to remove the race-based health formula or
race-based care standard from that list.
2. A registered nurse or licensed practical nurse shall not use
or authorize the use of a race-based health formula or race-based
care standard that is not included on the list of authorized race-
based health formulas and race-based care standards adopted
pursuant to subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Race-based care standard” means a standard of care that
requires or authorizes a registered nurse or licensed practical
nurse to take the race of the patient into account when making
determinations regarding the care that will be provided to a
patient.
(b) “Race-based health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
-
*SB192_R1*

– 21 –
calculating health-related data that takes the race of the patient
into account.
(c) “Race-neutral care standard” means a standard of care
that does not require or authorize a registered nurse or licensed
practical nurse to take the race of the patient into account when
making determinations regarding the care that will be provided to
a patient.
(d) “Race-neutral health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
calculating health-related data that does not take the race of the
patient into account.
Sec. 33. 1. Upon diagnosing a patient with arthritis,
osteoarthritis or any other condition that is regularly treated using
stem cell therapy, an advanced practice registered nurse shall
discuss with the patient the potential use of stem cell therapy to
treat the condition.
2. During the first encounter with a new patient, a provider of
primary care shall inform the patient of options that may be
available to the patient for donating, banking or storing stem cells
for future use by the patient or a donee.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(b) “Provider of primary care” means an advance practice
registered nurse or a group of providers of health care that
includes an advanced practice registered nurse which:
(1) Provides initial and primary health care services to a
patient; and
(2) Maintains the continuity of care for the patient.
(c) “Stem cell therapy” means a therapy involving the use of
human cells, tissues or cellular or tissue-based products.
Sec. 33.5. NRS 632.120 is hereby amended to read as follows:
632.120 1. The Board shall:
(a) Adopt regulations establishing reasonable standards:
(1) For the denial, renewal, suspension and revocation of,
and the placement of conditions, limitations and restrictions upon, a
license to practice professional or practical nursing or a certificate to
practice as a nursing assistant or medication aide - certified.
(2) Of professional conduct for the practice of nursing.
(3) For prescribing and dispensing controlled substances and
dangerous drugs in accordance with applicable statutes.
(4) For the psychiatric training and experience necessary for
an advanced practice registered nurse to be authorized to make the
diagnoses, evaluations , assessments and examinations described in
NRS 432B.6078, 432B.60816, 433A.162, 433A.240, 433A.335,
-
*SB192_R1*

– 22 –
433A.390, 433A.430, 484C.300 and 484C.320 to 484C.350,
inclusive, and section 22 of this act the certifications described in
NRS 432B.6075, 432B.60814, 433A.170, 433A.195 and 433A.200
and the sworn statements or declarations described in NRS
433A.210 and 433A.335.
(b) Prepare and administer examinations for the issuance of a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(c) Investigate and determine the eligibility of an applicant for a
license or certificate under this chapter.
(d) Carry out and enforce the provisions of this chapter and the
regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
(e) Develop and disseminate annually to each registered nurse
who cares for children information concerning the signs and
symptoms of pediatric cancer.
2. The Board may adopt regulations establishing reasonable:
(a) Qualifications for the issuance of a license or certificate
under this chapter.
(b) Standards for the continuing professional competence of
licensees or holders of a certificate. The Board may evaluate
licensees or holders of a certificate periodically for compliance with
those standards.
3. The Board may adopt regulations establishing a schedule of
reasonable fees and charges, in addition to those set forth in NRS
632.345, for:
(a) Investigating licensees or holders of a certificate and
applicants for a license or certificate under this chapter;
(b) Evaluating the professional competence of licensees or
holders of a certificate;
(c) Conducting hearings pursuant to this chapter;
(d) Duplicating and verifying records of the Board; and
(e) Surveying, evaluating and approving schools of practical
nursing, and schools and courses of professional nursing,
 and collect the fees established pursuant to this subsection.
4. For the purposes of this chapter, the Board shall, by
regulation, define the term “in the process of obtaining
accreditation.”
5. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as may be necessary to carry
out the provisions of this chapter relating to nursing assistant
trainees, nursing assistants and medication aides - certified.
6. The Board may adopt such other regulations, not
inconsistent with state or federal law, as are necessary to enable it to
administer the provisions of this chapter.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 23 –
Sec. 34. Chapter 633 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 35 and 36 of this act.
Sec. 35. 1. The Board, in consultation with the Board of
Medical Examiners and the State Board of Nursing, shall:
(a) Adopt regulations concerning the use of race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards by osteopathic physicians
and physician assistants. Those regulations must list specific
race-based health formulas and race-based care standards that
osteopathic physicians and physician assistants are authorized to
use. That list must not include a race-based health formula or a
race-based care standard if there is a race-neutral health formula
or race-neutral care standard, as applicable, that is scientifically
validated as being at least as effective for the same purpose.
(b) Monitor evolving scientific research and, not later than 1
year after a race-based health formula or race-based care
standard included on the list of authorized race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards adopted pursuant to
paragraph (a) ceases to meet the requirements of that paragraph,
propose regulations to remove the race-based health formula or
race-based care standard from that list.
2. An osteopathic physician or a physician assistant shall not
use a race-based health formula or race-based care standard that
is not included on the list of authorized race-based health
formulas and race-based care standards adopted pursuant to
subsection 1.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Race-based care standard” means a standard of care that
requires or authorizes an osteopathic physician or physician
assistant to take the race of the patient into account when making
determinations regarding the care that will be provided to a
patient.
(b) “Race-based health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
calculating health-related data that takes the race of the patient
into account.
(c) “Race-neutral care standard” means a standard of care
that does not require or authorize an osteopathic physician or
physician assistant to take the race of the patient into account
when making determinations regarding the care that will be
provided to a patient.
(d) “Race-neutral health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or
calculating health-related data that does not take the race of the
patient into account.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 24 –
Sec. 36. 1. Upon diagnosing a patient with arthritis,
osteoarthritis or any other condition that is regularly treated using
stem cell therapy, an osteopathic physician or physician assistant
shall discuss with the patient the potential use of stem cell therapy
to treat the condition.
2. During the first encounter with a new patient, a provider of
primary care shall inform the patient of options that may be
available to the patient for donating, banking or storing stem cells
for future use by the patient or a donee.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(b) “Provider of primary care” means an osteopathic
physician, physician assistant or group of providers of health care
that includes an osteopathic physician or physician assistant
which:
(1) Provides initial and primary health care services to a
patient; and
(2) Maintains the continuity of care for the patient.
(c) “Stem cell therapy” means a therapy involving the use of
human cells, tissues or cellular or tissue-based products.
Sec. 37. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 38. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 39. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 40. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 41. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 42. NRS 687B.692 is hereby amended to read as follows:
687B.692 1. A health carrier which offers or issues a network
plan may not deny a request from a provider of health care to enter
into a provider network contract with the health carrier [if] :
(a) If the provider of health care:
[(a)] (1) Meets and accepts the terms and conditions for
participation in the network of the health carrier, including, without
limitation:
[(1)] (I) Meeting any credentialing requirement of the health
carrier;
[(2)] (II) Agreeing to all provisions of the provider network
contract, including, without limitation, provisions setting forth the
grounds and procedures for terminating providers of health care
from participation in the network; and
[(3)] (III) Agreeing to participate in a review of the
performance and experience of the provider of health care at least
once each year or as otherwise required by the health carrier;
[(b)] (2) Is employed by or has accepted an offer of
employment from a school of medicine or school of osteopathic
-
*SB192_R1*

– 25 –
medicine in this State to serve in a position where the provider of
health care teaches students studying to become providers of health
care or resident physicians at least 50 percent of the time the
provider of health care is performing his or her duties for the school;
[(c)] (3) Does not have a clinical practice already established in
this State at the time the request to enter into a provider network
contract is made; and
[(d)] (4) Requests to be a participating provider of health care in
the network of the health carrier [.] ; or
(b) Because the provider of health care is a solo practitioner.
2. A health carrier which offers or issues a network plan may
deny a request from a provider of health care to enter into a provider
network contract with the health carrier if:
(a) The health carrier contracts with a third party for the delivery
of services to covered persons;
(b) Participating providers of health care are paid though
capitation agreements; or
(c) Accepting the provider of health care into the network plan
would disrupt existing provider network contracts.
3. A health carrier may terminate a provider network contract
entered into pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 for any
grounds authorized under the contract. Such grounds may include,
without limitation, failure to maintain the employment described in
subparagraph (2) of paragraph [(b)] (a) of subsection 1 or issues of
inconsistency with other participating providers of health care with
regard to:
(a) Access for covered persons to the services of the provider of
health care;
(b) The cost of the services of the provider of health care;
(c) The quality of care provided by the provider of health care;
or
(d) Other issues relating to the utilization of the services of the
provider of health care.
Sec. 43. Chapter 689A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that issues a policy of health insurance that
includes coverage for maternity care shall include in the policy
coverage for doula services.
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a doula
who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
-
*SB192_R1*

– 26 –
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of medical
care, including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the insurer. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
Sec. 44. NRS 689A.0415 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689A.0415 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
health insurance which provides coverage for prescription drugs or
devices shall include in the policy coverage for [any] :
(a) Testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal women;
and
(b) Any type of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of health insurance
that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of health insurance or cancel a
policy of health insurance solely because the person applying for or
covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [October]
January 1, [1999,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
-
*SB192_R1*

– 27 –
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 45. NRS 689A.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689A.330 If any policy is issued by a domestic insurer for
delivery to a person residing in another state, and if the insurance
commissioner or corresponding public officer of that other state has
informed the Commissioner that the policy is not subject to approval
or disapproval by that officer, the Commissioner may by ruling
require that the policy meet the standards set forth in NRS 689A.030
to 689A.320, inclusive [.] , and section 43 of this act.
Sec. 46. Chapter 689B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. An insurer that issues a policy of group health insurance
that includes coverage for maternity care shall include in the
policy coverage for doula services.
2. An insurer shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a doula
who participates in the network plan of the insurer.
3. A policy of group health insurance subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of
including the coverage required by subsection 1, and any
provision of the policy that conflicts with the provisions of this
section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of group health insurance
offered by an insurer under which the financing and delivery of
medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the insurer. The term does not
include an arrangement for the financing of premiums.
Sec. 47. NRS 689B.0376 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689B.0376 1. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of
group health insurance which provides coverage for prescription
drugs or devices shall include in the policy coverage for [any] :
-
*SB192_R1*

– 28 –
(a) Testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal women;
and
(b) Any type of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a policy of group health
insurance that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a policy of group health insurance or cancel a
policy of group health insurance solely because the person applying
for or covered by the policy uses or may use in the future hormone
replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A policy subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after [October]
January 1, [1999,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 48. Chapter 689C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A carrier that issues a health benefit plan that includes
coverage for maternity care shall include in the health benefit
plan coverage for doula services.
2. A carrier shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a doula
who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. A health benefit plan subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
-
*SB192_R1*

– 29 –
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan that
conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the carrier. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
Sec. 49. NRS 689C.1678 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
689C.1678 1. A carrier that offers or issues a health benefit
plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually, with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy [;] , including, without
limitation, testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal
women;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
-
*SB192_R1*

– 30 –
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A carrier must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the carrier.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a carrier that
offers or issues a health benefit plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health benefit
plan pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health benefit plan or cancel a health
benefit plan solely because the person applying for or covered by
the plan uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A plan subject to the provisions of this chapter that is
delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after January 1,
[2018,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage required
by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the renewal which
is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a carrier may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
-
*SB192_R1*

– 31 –
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health benefit plan offered by a
carrier under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are provided,
in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract
with the carrier. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 50. NRS 689C.425 is hereby amended to read as follows:
689C.425 A voluntary purchasing group and any contract
issued to such a group pursuant to NRS 689C.360 to 689C.600,
inclusive, are subject to the provisions of NRS 689C.015 to
689C.355, inclusive, and section 48 of this act, to the extent
applicable and not in conflict with the express provisions of NRS
687B.408 and 689C.360 to 689C.600, inclusive.
Sec. 51. Chapter 695A of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A society that issues a benefit contract that includes
coverage for maternity care shall include in the contract coverage
for doula services.
2. A society shall ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a doula
who participates in the network plan of the society.
3. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit contract
or renewal which is in conflict with the provisions of this section is
void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a
society under which the financing and delivery of medical care,
including items and services paid for as medical care, are
provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of providers
under contract with the society. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 32 –
Sec. 52. NRS 695A.1875 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695A.1875 1. A society that offers or issues a benefit
contract shall include in the contract coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy [;] , including, without
limitation, testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal
women;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A society must ensure that the benefits required by
subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a provider of
health care who participates in the network plan of the society.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 33 –
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a society that
offers or issues a benefit contract shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the benefit contract
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a benefit contract or cancel a benefit contract
solely because the person applying for or covered by the contract
uses or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A benefit contract subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, [2018,] 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the benefit
contract or the renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a society may use medical management techniques, including,
without limitation, any available clinical evidence, to determine the
frequency of or treatment relating to any benefit required by this
section or the type of provider of health care to use for such
treatment.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a benefit contract offered by a society
under which the financing and delivery of medical care, including
items and services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole
or in part, through a defined set of providers under contract with the
society. The term does not include an arrangement for the financing
of premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 34 –
Sec. 53. Chapter 695B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A hospital or medical services corporation that issues a
policy of health insurance that includes coverage for maternity
care shall include in the policy coverage for doula services.
2. A hospital or medical services corporation shall ensure
that the benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an
insured through a doula who participates in the network plan of
the hospital or medical services corporation.
3. A policy of health insurance subject to the provisions of
this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or
after January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the
coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the policy
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a policy of health insurance offered
by a hospital or medical services corporation under which the
financing and delivery of medical care, including items and
services paid for as medical care, are provided, in whole or in part,
through a defined set of providers under contract with the hospital
or medical services corporation. The term does not include an
arrangement for the financing of premiums.
Sec. 54. NRS 695B.1916 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695B.1916 1. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for
hospital or medical service which provides coverage for prescription
drugs or devices shall include in the contract coverage for [any] :
(a) Testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal women;
and
(b) Any type of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration.
2. An insurer that offers or issues a contract for hospital or
medical service that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall
not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for a prescription for hormone
replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a contract for hospital or medical service or
cancel a contract for hospital or medical service solely because the
-
*SB192_R1*

– 35 –
person applying for or covered by the contract uses or may use in
the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an insured, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an insured.
3. A contract for hospital or medical service subject to the
provisions of this chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or
renewed on or after [October] January 1, [1999,] 2026, has the
legal effect of including the coverage required by subsection 1, and
any provision of the contract or the renewal which is in conflict with
this section is void.
4. The provisions of this section do not require an insurer to
provide coverage for fertility drugs.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 55. Chapter 695C of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A health maintenance organization that issues a health
care plan that includes coverage for maternity care shall include
in the health care plan coverage for doula services.
2. A health maintenance organization shall ensure that the
benefits required by subsection 1 are made available to an enrollee
through a doula who participates in the network plan of the health
maintenance organization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the health care plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
health maintenance organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers under contract with the health maintenance
-
*SB192_R1*

– 36 –
organization. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
Sec. 56. NRS 695C.050 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.050 1. Except as otherwise provided in this chapter or
in specific provisions of this title, the provisions of this title are not
applicable to any health maintenance organization granted a
certificate of authority under this chapter. This provision does not
apply to an insurer licensed and regulated pursuant to this title
except with respect to its activities as a health maintenance
organization authorized and regulated pursuant to this chapter.
2. Solicitation of enrollees by a health maintenance
organization granted a certificate of authority, or its representatives,
must not be construed to violate any provision of law relating to
solicitation or advertising by practitioners of a healing art.
3. Any health maintenance organization authorized under this
chapter shall not be deemed to be practicing medicine and is exempt
from the provisions of chapter 630 of NRS.
4. The provisions of NRS 695C.110, 695C.125, 695C.1691,
695C.1693, 695C.170, 695C.1703, 695C.1705, 695C.1709 to
695C.173, inclusive, 695C.1733, 695C.17335, 695C.1734,
695C.1751, 695C.1755, 695C.1759, 695C.176 to 695C.200,
inclusive, and 695C.265 do not apply to a health maintenance
organization that provides health care services through managed
care to recipients of Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid or
insurance pursuant to the Children’s Health Insurance Program
pursuant to a contract with the Division of Health Care Financing
and Policy of the Department of Health and Human Services. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
5. The provisions of NRS 695C.16932 to 695C.1699,
inclusive, 695C.1701, 695C.1708, 695C.1728, 695C.1731,
695C.17333, 695C.17345, 695C.17347, 695C.1736 to 695C.1745,
inclusive, 695C.1757 and 695C.204 and section 55 of this act apply
to a health maintenance organization that provides health care
services through managed care to recipients of Medicaid under the
State Plan for Medicaid.
6. The provisions of NRS 695C.17095 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to
members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program. This
subsection does not exempt a health maintenance organization from
any provision of this chapter for services provided pursuant to any
other contract.
7. The provisions of NRS 695C.1735 do not apply to a health
maintenance organization that provides health care services to:
-
*SB192_R1*

– 37 –
(a) The officers and employees, and the dependents of officers
and employees, of the governing body of any county, school district,
municipal corporation, political subdivision, public corporation or
other local governmental agency of this State; or
(b) Members of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program.
 This subsection does not exempt a health maintenance
organization from any provision of this chapter for services
provided pursuant to any other contract.
Sec. 57. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 58. NRS 695C.1694 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695C.1694 1. A health maintenance organization which
offers or issues a health care plan that provides coverage for
prescription drugs or devices shall include in the plan coverage for
[any] :
(a) Testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal women;
and
(b) Any type of hormone replacement therapy which is lawfully
prescribed or ordered and which has been approved by the Food and
Drug Administration.
2. A health maintenance organization that offers or issues a
health care plan that provides coverage for prescription drugs shall
not:
(a) Require an enrollee to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition for coverage for hormone replacement therapy;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use in the future hormone replacement therapy;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an enrollee to discourage the enrollee from accessing
hormone replacement therapy;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides hormone
replacement therapy to an enrollee, including, without limitation,
reducing the reimbursement of the provider of health care; or
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay hormone replacement therapy to an
enrollee.
3. Evidence of coverage subject to the provisions of this
chapter that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
[October] January 1, [1999,] 2026, has the legal effect of including
the coverage required by subsection 1, and any provision of the
evidence of coverage or the renewal which is in conflict with this
section is void.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 38 –
4. The provisions of this section do not require a health
maintenance organization to provide coverage for fertility drugs.
5. As used in this section, “provider of health care” has the
meaning ascribed to it in NRS 629.031.
Sec. 59. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 60. NRS 695C.330 is hereby amended to read as follows:
695C.330 1. The Commissioner may suspend or revoke any
certificate of authority issued to a health maintenance organization
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter if the Commissioner finds
that any of the following conditions exist:
(a) The health maintenance organization is operating
significantly in contravention of its basic organizational document,
its health care plan or in a manner contrary to that described in and
reasonably inferred from any other information submitted pursuant
to NRS 695C.060, 695C.070 and 695C.140, unless any amendments
to those submissions have been filed with and approved by the
Commissioner;
(b) The health maintenance organization issues evidence of
coverage or uses a schedule of charges for health care services
which do not comply with the requirements of NRS 695C.1691 to
695C.200, inclusive, and section 55 of this act, 695C.204 or
695C.207;
(c) The health care plan does not furnish comprehensive health
care services as provided for in NRS 695C.060;
(d) The Commissioner certifies that the health maintenance
organization:
(1) Does not meet the requirements of subsection 1 of NRS
695C.080; or
(2) Is unable to fulfill its obligations to furnish health care
services as required under its health care plan;
(e) The health maintenance organization is no longer financially
responsible and may reasonably be expected to be unable to meet its
obligations to enrollees or prospective enrollees;
(f) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect a mechanism affording the enrollees an opportunity to
participate in matters relating to the content of programs pursuant to
NRS 695C.110;
(g) The health maintenance organization has failed to put into
effect the system required by NRS 695C.260 for:
(1) Resolving complaints in a manner reasonably to dispose
of valid complaints; and
(2) Conducting external reviews of adverse determinations
that comply with the provisions of NRS 695G.241 to 695G.310,
inclusive;
-
*SB192_R1*

– 39 –
(h) The health maintenance organization or any person on its
behalf has advertised or merchandised its services in an untrue,
misrepresentative, misleading, deceptive or unfair manner;
(i) The continued operation of the health maintenance
organization would be hazardous to its enrollees or creditors or to
the general public;
(j) The health maintenance organization fails to provide the
coverage required by NRS 695C.1691; or
(k) The health maintenance organization has otherwise failed to
comply substantially with the provisions of this chapter.
2. A certificate of authority must be suspended or revoked only
after compliance with the requirements of NRS 695C.340.
3. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is suspended, the health maintenance organization shall
not, during the period of that suspension, enroll any additional
groups or new individual contracts, unless those groups or persons
were contracted for before the date of suspension.
4. If the certificate of authority of a health maintenance
organization is revoked, the organization shall proceed, immediately
following the effective date of the order of revocation, to wind up its
affairs and shall conduct no further business except as may be
essential to the orderly conclusion of the affairs of the organization.
It shall engage in no further advertising or solicitation of any kind.
The Commissioner may, by written order, permit such further
operation of the organization as the Commissioner may find to be in
the best interest of enrollees to the end that enrollees are afforded
the greatest practical opportunity to obtain continuing coverage for
health care.
Sec. 61. Chapter 695G of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A managed care organization that issues a health care
plan that includes coverage for maternity care shall include in the
health care plan coverage for doula services.
2. A managed care organization shall ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through
a doula who participates in the network plan of the managed care
organization.
3. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2026, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the health care plan
that conflicts with the provisions of this section is void.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Doula services” means services to provide education and
support relating to childbirth, including, without limitation,
-
*SB192_R1*

– 40 –
emotional and physical support provided during pregnancy, labor,
birth and the postpartum period.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and
delivery of medical care, including items and services paid for as
medical care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined
set of providers under contract with the managed care
organization. The term does not include an arrangement for the
financing of premiums.
Sec. 62. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 63. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 64. NRS 695G.1717 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
695G.1717 1. A managed care organization that offers or
issues a health care plan shall include in the plan coverage for:
(a) Counseling, support and supplies for breastfeeding,
including breastfeeding equipment, counseling and education during
the antenatal, perinatal and postpartum period for not more than 1
year;
(b) Screening and counseling for interpersonal and domestic
violence for women at least annually with initial intervention
services consisting of education, strategies to reduce harm,
supportive services or a referral for any other appropriate services;
(c) Behavioral counseling concerning sexually transmitted
diseases from a provider of health care for sexually active women
who are at increased risk for such diseases;
(d) Hormone replacement therapy [;] , including, without
limitation, testosterone replacement therapy for menopausal
women;
(e) Such prenatal screenings and tests as recommended by the
American College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists or its
successor organization;
(f) Screening for blood pressure abnormalities and diabetes,
including gestational diabetes, after at least 24 weeks of gestation or
as ordered by a provider of health care;
(g) Screening for cervical cancer at such intervals as are
recommended by the American College of Obstetricians and
Gynecologists or its successor organization;
(h) Screening for depression;
(i) Screening and counseling for the human immunodeficiency
virus consisting of a risk assessment, annual education relating to
prevention and at least one screening for the virus during the
lifetime of the insured or as ordered by a provider of health care;
-
*SB192_R1*

– 41 –
(j) Smoking cessation programs for an insured who is 18 years
of age or older consisting of not more than two cessation attempts
per year and four counseling sessions per year;
(k) All vaccinations recommended by the Advisory Committee
on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and
Prevention of the United States Department of Health and Human
Services or its successor organization; and
(l) Such well-woman preventative visits as recommended by the
Health Resources and Services Administration, which must include
at least one such visit per year beginning at 14 years of age.
2. A managed care organization must ensure that the benefits
required by subsection 1 are made available to an insured through a
provider of health care who participates in the network plan of the
managed care organization.
3. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 5, a managed
care organization that offers or issues a health care plan shall not:
(a) Require an insured to pay a higher deductible, any
copayment or coinsurance or require a longer waiting period or
other condition to obtain any benefit provided in the health care plan
pursuant to subsection 1;
(b) Refuse to issue a health care plan or cancel a health care plan
solely because the person applying for or covered by the plan uses
or may use any such benefit;
(c) Offer or pay any type of material inducement or financial
incentive to an insured to discourage the insured from obtaining any
such benefit;
(d) Penalize a provider of health care who provides any such
benefit to an insured, including, without limitation, reducing the
reimbursement of the provider of health care;
(e) Offer or pay any type of material inducement, bonus or other
financial incentive to a provider of health care to deny, reduce,
withhold, limit or delay access to any such benefit to an insured; or
(f) Impose any other restrictions or delays on the access of an
insured to any such benefit.
4. A health care plan subject to the provisions of this chapter
that is delivered, issued for delivery or renewed on or after
January 1, 2018, has the legal effect of including the coverage
required by subsection 1, and any provision of the plan or the
renewal which is in conflict with this section is void.
5. Except as otherwise provided in this section and federal law,
a managed care organization may use medical management
techniques, including, without limitation, any available clinical
evidence, to determine the frequency of or treatment relating to any
benefit required by this section or the type of provider of health care
to use for such treatment.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 42 –
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Medical management technique” means a practice which is
used to control the cost or utilization of health care services or
prescription drug use. The term includes, without limitation, the use
of step therapy, prior authorization or categorizing drugs and
devices based on cost, type or method of administration.
(b) “Network plan” means a health care plan offered by a
managed care organization under which the financing and delivery
of medical care, including items and services paid for as medical
care, are provided, in whole or in part, through a defined set of
providers under contract with the managed care organization. The
term does not include an arrangement for the financing of
premiums.
(c) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
Sec. 65. 1. On or before February 1, 2027, the Board of
Medical Examiners, the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine, the
University of Nevada, Reno, School of Medicine and the University
of Nevada, Las Vegas, School of Medicine shall:
(a) Study disparities in health care access, the provision of
health care and health care outcomes. The study must include,
without limitation, the analyses of:
(1) The historical use of race-based health formulas and race-
based care standards;
(2) The current use of race-based health formulas and race-
based care standards;
(3) The effect of the use of race-based health formulas and
race-based care standards on:
(I) Outcomes for patients;
(II) Diagnoses of patients, including, without limitation,
classifications of diseases;
(III) The procedures, medications and other treatment
prescribed or recommended for patients;
(IV) Insurance coverage of the conditions and symptoms
with which patients have been diagnosed and the procedures,
medications and other treatments prescribed or recommended to
treat those conditions and symptoms; and
(V) The eligibility of patients for compensation for
disabilities, including, without limitation, compensation for work-
related injuries and occupational diseases pursuant to title 53 of
NRS and disability insurance benefits under the federal Social
Security Act, and the amounts received through those programs.
(b) Publish a report of the study performed pursuant to
paragraph (a) on the Internet websites maintained by the Board of
Medical Examiners and the State Board of Osteopathic Medicine.
-
*SB192_R1*

– 43 –
(c) Submit the report published pursuant to paragraph (b) to the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for transmittal to the
next regular session of the Legislature.
2. As used in this section:
(a) “Provider of health care” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 629.031.
(b) “Race-based care standard” means a standard of care that
requires or authorizes a provider of health care to take the race of
the patient into account when making determinations regarding the
care that will be provided to a patient.
(c) “Race-based health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or calculating
health-related data that takes the race of the patient into account.
(d) “Race-neutral care standard” means a standard of care that
does not require or authorize a provider of health care to take the
race of the patient into account when making determinations
regarding the care that will be provided to a patient.
(e) “Race-neutral health formula” means a formula for
determining whether a health-related condition exists or calculating
health-related data that does not take the race of the patient into
account.
Sec. 66. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 67. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 67.5. 1. On or before January 1, 2026, an insurer that is
subject to NRS 689A.0415, as amended by section 44 of this act,
NRS 689B.0376, as amended by section 47 of this act or NRS
695B.1916, as amended by section 54 of this act, a carrier that is
subject to NRS 689C.1678, as amended by section 49 of this act, a
society that is subject to NRS 695A.1875, as amended by section 52
of this act, a health maintenance organization that is subject to NRS
695C.1694, as amended by section 58 of this act, a managed care
organization that is subject to the provisions of NRS 695G.1717, as
amended by section 64 of this act, the governing body of a local
governmental agency that provides group health coverage through a
self-insurance reserve fund pursuant to NRS 287.010 and the Board
of the Public Employees’ Benefits Program shall submit to the
Commissioner of Insurance a plan for complying with the
amendatory provisions of section 44, 47, 49, 52, 54, 58 or 64 of this
act, as applicable.
2. On or before February 1, 2026, the Commissioner shall:
(a) Evaluate the plans submitted pursuant to subsection 1 to
determine whether the actions described in those plans will result in
compliance with the amendatory provisions of section 44, 47, 49,
52, 54, 58 or 64 of this act, as applicable; and
-
*SB192_R1*

– 44 –
(b) Post on an Internet website maintained by the Commissioner
a bulletin stating, for each entity that is required to submit a plan
pursuant to subsection 1, whether the entity is likely to be in
compliance with amendatory provisions of section 44, 47, 49, 52,
54, 58 or 64 of this act, as applicable.
Sec. 68. The provisions of NRS 354.599 do not apply to any
additional expenses of a local government that are related to the
provisions of this act.
Sec. 69. 1. This section and sections 37, 65, 67, 67.5 and 68
of this act become effective upon passage and approval.
2. Section 19 of this act becomes effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On July 1, 2025, for all other purposes.
3. Sections 1 to 18, inclusive, 20 to 36, inclusive, 38 to 64,
inclusive, and 66 of this act become effective:
(a) Upon passage and approval for the purpose of adopting any
regulations and performing any other preparatory administrative
tasks that are necessary to carry out the provisions of this act; and
(b) On January 1, 2026, for all other purposes.
H
-
*SB192_R1*